District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.90

Repealed

Liquidation proceedings — Jurisdiction of court.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 217, ch. 269, § 90
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 241, Pub. L. 86-106, § 11
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 589, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 168(c)(2)
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-931b.
1981 Ed., § 29-390.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.90.